test/src/morphology/A_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - luäǯ'ǯ class A1a: # Adjective 'loose' - full paradigm
#    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Pred+Sg: luäǯ'ǯ
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Pred+Pl: luäǯǯ
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Attr: luäǯǯas
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Comp: luäǯǯab
    luäǯ'ǯ+A+Superl: luäǯǯmõs

  Adjective - čueˊǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'shallow' - full paradigm
#    čueˊǩǩ+A+Pred+Sg: čueˊǩǩ
    čueˊǩǩ+A+Pred+Pl: čueˊjj
    čueˊǩǩ+A+Attr: čueˊjjes
    čueˊǩǩ+A+Comp: čueˊjjab
    čueˊǩǩ+A+Superl: čueˊjjmõs

  Adjective - kuˊǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'long' - full paradigm
#    kuˊǩǩ+A+Pred+Sg: kuˊǩǩ
    kuˊǩǩ+A+Pred+Pl: kuˊǩ
    kuˊǩǩ+A+Attr: kuˊǩes
    kuˊǩǩ+A+Comp: kuˊǩab
    kuˊǩǩ+A+Superl: kuˊǩmõs

  Adjective - neuˊrr class A1e: # Adjective 'bad' - full paradigm
#    neuˊrr+A+Pred+Sg: neuˊrr
    neuˊrr+A+Pred+Pl: neeuˊr
    neuˊrr+A+Attr: neeuˊres
    neuˊrr+A+Comp: neeuˊrab
    neuˊrr+A+Superl: neeuˊrmõs

  Adjective - čââvas class A4a: # Adjective 'durable' - full paradigm
#    čââvas+A+Pred+Sg: čââvas
#    čââvas+A+Pred+Pl: čââvas
    čââvas+A+Attr: čââpp
    čââvas+A+Comp: čââppsab
    čââvas+A+Superl: čââppsumus

  Adjective - kõõumâs class A4â: # Adjective 'hard' - full paradigm
#    kõõumâs+A+Pred+Sg: kõõumâs
#    kõõumâs+A+Pred+Pl: kõõumâs
    kõõumâs+A+Attr: kõumm
#    kõõumâs+A+Comp: kõummsab
#    kõõumâs+A+Superl: kõummsumus
    
  Adjective - jõõskâs class A4â: # Adjective 'quiet' - full paradigm
#    jõõskâs+A+Pred+Sg: jõõskâs
#    jõõskâs+A+Pred+Pl: jõõskâs
    jõõskâs+A+Attr: jõskk
    jõõskâs+A+Comp: jõskksab
    jõõskâs+A+Superl: jõskksumus

  Adjective - joorbâs class A4â: # Adjective 'round' - full paradigm
#    joorbâs+A+Pred+Sg: joorbâs
    joorbâs+A+Attr: jorbb

  Adjective - tiiudâs class A4â: # Adjective 'full' - full paradigm
#    tiiudâs+A+Pred+Sg: tiiudâs
    tiiudâs+A+Attr: tiudd

  Adjective - vuäˊmes class A4e: # Adjective 'old' - full paradigm
#    vuäˊmes+A+Pred+Sg: vuäˊm
#    vuäˊmes+A+Pred+Pl: vuäˊmes
    vuäˊmes+A+Attr: vuäˊmm
#    vuäˊmes+A+Comp: vuämmsab
#    vuäˊmes+A+Superl: vuämmsumus

#  Adjective - pâˊsttel class A8: # Adjective 'sharp' - full paradigm
#    pâˊsttel+A+Pred+Sg: pâˊsttel
#    pâˊsttel+A+Pred+Pl: pâˊsttel
#    pâˊsttel+A+Attr: pâˊsttlõs
#    pâˊsttel+A+Comp: pâˊsttlab
#    pâˊsttel+A+Superl: pâˊsttlumus
